Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-514
Vehicle tank; equipment.

Each vehicle tank, used in the retail or wholesale sale of liquefied petroleum gas, shall be equipped with a meter for measurement of liquefied petroleum gas in terms of gallons, and shall not be equipped with a bypass around the meter; Provided, that the prohibition of a bypass is not intended to prohibit the use of an equalization line.

Laws 1957, c. 240, § 7, p. 802.